District of Columbia statutes.
4-213.05

Noncompliance by relative.

Whenever a responsible relative fails to provide information necessary to determine his ability to support, or when it has been determined that he is financially able to but has not contributed to the person in need of assistance, the case shall be evaluated for appropriate action including referral to Corporation Counsel.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1305, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-213.5.